Maryland, session 2026, HB1272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–534.
(a) (1) In this section, “kinship caregiver” means an individual:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1272*

HOUSE BILL 1272
(i) with whom a child who is in the care, custody, or guardianship of
the local department may be placed for temporary or long–term care other than adoption;
and
(ii) who is approved by the local department under subsection (e) of
this section.
(2) “Kinship caregiver” includes:
(i) a kinship parent;
(ii) an individual who is related to the child through blood or
marriage, adoption, tribal law or custom, or cultural custom or practice; and
(iii) an individual who is unrelated to the child but has a strong
familial or other significant bond with the child, or is a person identified by the CHILD OR
THE child’s parent.
(b) The Secretary of Human Services shall establish and maintain a kinship care
program.
(c) (1) In selecting a placement that is in the best [interests] INTEREST of a
child in need of out–of–home placement, in the absence of good cause to the contrary, the
local department shall give preference to placement with a kinship caregiver.
(2) The local department shall exhaust all reasonable resources to make
proactive, thorough, and timely efforts to locate a kinship caregiver for initial placement of
the child.
(3) IN SELECTING A PLACEMENT THAT IS IN THE BEST INTEREST OF A
CHILD IN AN OUT–OF–HOME PLACEMENT, THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT SHALL
CONSIDER THE CHILD’S FEELINGS AND VIEWS ABOUT A PROSPECTIVE KINSHIP
CAREGIVER.
(4) If the local department cannot locate a kinship caregiver at the time of
the initial placement, then preference shall be given to a placement that most approximates
a family in which the child’s special needs, if any, may be met, taking into account the
following:
(i) the proximity of the placement to the child’s home, extended
family, or siblings;
(ii) the child’s culture or language continuity;
(iii) the child’s age; and

HOUSE BILL 1272 3
(iv) the child’s developmental and educational needs.
[(4)] (5) If a kinship caregiver is located subsequent to the placement of a
child in a foster care setting, the local department shall, in the best interest of the child,
place the child with the kinship caregiver.
(d) A kinship caregiver may not be under the age of 18 years.
(e) (1) The local department shall approve an individual as a kinship caregiver
if:
(i) the individual is related to the child through blood or marriage,
adoption, tribal law or custom, or cultural custom or practice;
(ii) the individual has a strong familial or other significant bond to
the child or the child’s family or is a person identified by the child’s parent; and
(iii) placement with the individual is in the child’s best interest.
(2) WHEN DETERMINING WHETHER TO APPROVE AN INDIVIDUAL AS A
KINSHIP CAREGIVER, THE LOCAL DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL’S KNOWLEDGE AND UNDERSTANDING OF
THE CIRCUMSTANCES SAFETY CONCERNS THAT LED TO THE NEED FOR THE CHILD’S
PLACEMENT;
(II) THE INDIVIDUAL’S PREVIOUS INVOLVEMENT IN HELPING OR
PROTECTING THE CHILD;
(III) THE INDIVIDUAL’S PREVIOUS INVOLVEMENT IN
PREVENTING OCCURRENCES OF ABUSE OR MALTREATMENT OF THE CHILD;
(IV) THE INDIVIDUAL’S CURRENT ABILITY TO PROTECT THE
CHILD;
(V) THE INDIVIDUAL’S ABILITY TO UNDERSTAND THE NEED FOR
PROTECTION OF THE CHILD; AND
(VI) THE INDIVIDUAL’S WILLINGNESS TO COOPERATE WITH THE
LOCAL DEPARTMENT;
(VII) WHETHER THERE HAVE BEEN PREVIOUS OR CURRENT
ALLEGATIONS OF ABUSE OR NEGLECT ALLEGED AGAINST THE INDIVIDUAL BY THE
CHILD, THE CHILD’S PARENT, OR ANOTHER RELATIVE OF THE CHILD;

HOUSE BILL 1272
(VIII) THE INDIVIDUAL’S WILLINGNESS TO ABIDE BY COURT
ORDERS; AND
(IX) THE INDIVIDUAL’S WILLINGNESS TO COOPERATE WITH THE
CHILD’S PARENTS AND TO FACILITATE CONTACT AS ORDERED BY THE COURT AND
GUIDED BY THE SAFETY PLAN.
(3) A prospective kinship caregiver shall provide to the local department
any information the local department requests to enable the local department to determine
whether the individual meets the criteria specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(f) The Administration shall adopt regulations and policies consistent with this
section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.